Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2081.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Gerald Reiter and Leon Hahn Memorial Bridge.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Gerald Andrew Reiter was born February 12, 1948, in Natrona Heights. Leon Henry Hahn was born May 12, 1946, in McKees Rock.(2) PFC Reiter attended West Branch High School and Sgt. Hahn attended Cooper Township High School.(3) Outside of work, both PFC Reiter and Sgt. Hahn were active members at the Shepherd of the Hills Lutheran Church.(4) PFC Reiter enlisted in the Marines in 1966. PFC Reiter was deployed to Vietnam with the 5th Battalion. He received two Purple Hearts.12345678910111213141516171819 (5) PFC Reiter was wounded by a land mine in October 1966. Upon recovery from his injuries, PFC Reiter returned to action. PFC Reiter was killed in action on May 12, 1967, from hostile fire while on an operation in the vicinity of Quang Tin, Vietnam.(6) Sgt. Hahn served in the Marines, Logistics Support Group Alpha 3rd Service Battalion Force Logistics Command. Sgt. Hahn was stationed in Hue, Vietnam, on the "Fuel Farm."(7) Sgt. Hahn was unloading contaminated fuel when an explosion occurred, causing him to be severely injured. He was transferred to Yokohama, Japan, where he passed away on May 16, 1968.(b) Designation.--The bridge, identified as Bridge Key 11669, carrying Quehanna Highway over Mosquito Creek, Karthaus Township, Clearfield County, is designated as the Gerald Reiter and Leon Hahn Memorial Bridge.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to traffic in both directions on the bridge.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2081PN2670 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021